pl.aff
FLAG long
SFX i1 Y 344
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięcia  ląc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięcie  ląc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciach ląc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciami ląc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciem ląc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciom ląc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciu  ląc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięć    ląc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięcia  siąc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięcie  siąc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciach siąc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciami siąc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciem siąc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciom siąc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięciu  siąc
SFX i1   ąc        ęgnięć    siąc
SFX i1   ąc        ężenia    rząc
SFX i1   ąc        ężenie    rząc
SFX i1   ąc        ężeniach  rząc
SFX i1   ąc        ężeniami  rząc
SFX i1   ąc        ężeniem   rząc
SFX i1   ąc        ężeniom   rząc
SFX i1   ąc        ężeniu    rząc
SFX i1   ąc        ężeń      rząc
SFX i1   c         gnięcia   lec
SFX i1   c         gnięcie   lec
SFX i1   c         gnięciach lec
SFX i1   c         gnięciami lec
SFX i1   c         gnięciem  lec
SFX i1   c         gnięciom  lec
SFX i1   c         gnięciu   lec
SFX i1   c         gnięć     lec
SFX i1   c         knięcia   rzec
SFX i1   c         knięcie   rzec
SFX i1   c         knięciach rzec
SFX i1   c         knięciami rzec
SFX i1   c         knięciem  rzec
SFX i1   c         knięciom  rzec
SFX i1   c         knięciu   rzec
SFX i1   c         knięć     rzec
SFX i1   c         gnięcia   [^c]iec
SFX i1   c         gnięcie   [^c]iec
SFX i1   c         gnięciach [^c]iec
SFX i1   c         gnięciami [^c]iec
SFX i1   c         gnięciem  [^c]iec
SFX i1   c         gnięciom  [^c]iec
SFX i1   c         gnięciu   [^c]iec
SFX i1   c         gnięć     [^c]iec
SFX i1   c         knięcia   ciec
SFX i1   c         knięcie   ciec
SFX i1   c         knięciach ciec
SFX i1   c         knięciami ciec
SFX i1   c         knięciem  ciec
SFX i1   c         knięciom  ciec
SFX i1   c         knięciu   ciec
SFX i1   c         knięć     ciec
SFX i1   óc        ożenia    móc
SFX i1   óc        ożenie    móc
SFX i1   óc        ożeniach  móc
SFX i1   óc        ożeniami  móc
SFX i1   óc        ożeniem   móc
SFX i1   óc        ożeniom   móc
SFX i1   óc        ożeniu    móc
SFX i1   óc        ożeń      móc
SFX i1   ć         nia       [^i]ać
SFX i1   ć         nie       [^i]ać
SFX i1   ć         niem      [^i]ać
SFX i1   ć         niu       [^i]ać
SFX i1   ć         niami     [^i]ać
SFX i1   ć         niom      [^i]ać
SFX i1   ć         niach     [^i]ać
SFX i1   ć         ń         [^i]ać
SFX i1   ąć        ięcia     [sz]nąć
SFX i1   ąć        ięcie     [sz]nąć
SFX i1   ąć        ięciem    [sz]nąć
SFX i1   ąć        ięciu     [sz]nąć
SFX i1   ąć        ięciami   [sz]nąć
SFX i1   ąć        ięciom    [sz]nąć
SFX i1   ąć        ięciach   [sz]nąć
SFX i1   ąć        ięć       [sz]nąć
SFX i1   ąć        ęcia      cząć
SFX i1   ąć        ęcie      cząć
SFX i1   ąć        ęciem     cząć
SFX i1   ąć        ęciu      cząć
SFX i1   ąć        ęciami    cząć
SFX i1   ąć        ęciom     cząć
SFX i1   ąć        ęciach    cząć
SFX i1   ąć        ęć        cząć
SFX i1   ć         nia       [^irz]eć
SFX i1   ć         nie       [^irz]eć
SFX i1   ć         niem      [^irz]eć
SFX i1   ć         niu       [^irz]eć
SFX i1   ć         niami     [^irz]eć
SFX i1   ć         niom      [^irz]eć
SFX i1   ć         niach     [^irz]eć
SFX i1   ć         ń         [^irz]eć
SFX i1   ć         nia       zieć
SFX i1   ć         nie       zieć
SFX i1   ć         niem      zieć
SFX i1   ć         niu       zieć
SFX i1   ć         niami     zieć
SFX i1   ć         niom      zieć
SFX i1   ć         niach     zieć
SFX i1   ć         ń         zieć
SFX i1   reć       arcia     reć
SFX i1   reć       arcie     reć
SFX i1   reć       arciem    reć
SFX i1   reć       arciu     reć
SFX i1   reć       arciami   reć
SFX i1   reć       arciom    reć
SFX i1   reć       arciach   reć
SFX i1   reć       arć       reć
SFX i1   ć         nia       [cs]zeć
SFX i1   ć         nie       [cs]zeć
SFX i1   ć         niem      [cs]zeć
SFX i1   ć         niu       [cs]zeć
SFX i1   ć         niami     [cs]zeć
SFX i1   ć         niom      [cs]zeć
SFX i1   ć         niach     [cs]zeć
SFX i1   ć         ń         [cs]zeć
SFX i1   rzeć      arcia     rzeć
SFX i1   rzeć      arcie     rzeć
SFX i1   rzeć      arciem    rzeć
SFX i1   rzeć      arciu     rzeć
SFX i1   rzeć      arciami   rzeć
SFX i1   rzeć      arciom    rzeć
SFX i1   rzeć      arciach   rzeć
SFX i1   rzeć      arć       rzeć
SFX i1   ć         nia       [^cz]i[ae]ć
SFX i1   ć         nie       [^cz]i[ae]ć
SFX i1   ć         niem      [^cz]i[ae]ć
SFX i1   ć         niu       [^cz]i[ae]ć
SFX i1   ć         niami     [^cz]i[ae]ć
SFX i1   ć         niom      [^cz]i[ae]ć
SFX i1   ć         niach     [^cz]i[ae]ć
SFX i1   ć         ń         [^cz]i[ae]ć
SFX i1   ieć       enia      [^ś]cieć
SFX i1   ieć       enie      [^ś]cieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniem     [^ś]cieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniu      [^ś]cieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniami    [^ś]cieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniom     [^ś]cieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniach    [^ś]cieć
SFX i1   ieć       eń        [^ś]cieć
SFX i1   ć         nia       ścieć
SFX i1   ć         nie       ścieć
SFX i1   ć         niem      ścieć
SFX i1   ć         niu       ścieć
SFX i1   ć         niami     ścieć
SFX i1   ć         niom      ścieć
SFX i1   ć         niach     ścieć
SFX i1   ć         ń         ścieć
SFX i1   ieć       enia      dzieć
SFX i1   ieć       enie      dzieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniem     dzieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniu      dzieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniami    dzieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniom     dzieć
SFX i1   ieć       eniach    dzieć
SFX i1   ieć       eń        dzieć
SFX i1   ć         enia      [^acelosz]ić
SFX i1   ć         enie      [^acelosz]ić
SFX i1   ć         eniem     [^acelosz]ić
SFX i1   ć         eniu      [^acelosz]ić
SFX i1   ć         eniami    [^acelosz]ić
SFX i1   ć         eniom     [^acelosz]ić
SFX i1   ć         eniach    [^acelosz]ić
SFX i1   ć         eń        [^acelosz]ić
SFX i1   ić        jenia     [aeo]ić
SFX i1   ić        jenie     [aeo]ić
SFX i1   ić        jeniem    [aeo]ić
SFX i1   ić        jeniu     [aeo]ić
SFX i1   ić        jeniami   [aeo]ić
SFX i1   ić        jeniom    [aeo]ić
SFX i1   ić        jeniach   [aeo]ić
SFX i1   ić        jeń       [aeo]ić
SFX i1   ić        enia      [^śzź][cl]ić
SFX i1   ić        enie      [^śzź][cl]ić
SFX i1   ić        eniem     [^śzź][cl]ić
SFX i1   ić        eniu      [^śzź][cl]ić
SFX i1   ić        eniami    [^śzź][cl]ić
SFX i1   ić        eniom     [^śzź][cl]ić
SFX i1   ić        eniach    [^śzź][cl]ić
SFX i1   ić        eń        [^śzź][cl]ić
SFX i1   ścić      szczenia  ścić
SFX i1   ścić      szczenie  ścić
SFX i1   ścić      szczeniem ścić
SFX i1   ścić      szczeniu  ścić
SFX i1   ścić      szczeniami ścić
SFX i1   ścić      szczeniom ścić
SFX i1   ścić      szczeniach ścić
SFX i1   ścić      szczeń    ścić
SFX i1   ić        enia      [śź]lić
SFX i1   ić        enie      [śź]lić
SFX i1   ić        eniem     [śź]lić
SFX i1   ić        eniu      [śź]lić
SFX i1   ić        eniami    [śź]lić
SFX i1   ić        eniom     [śź]lić
SFX i1   ić        eniach    [śź]lić
SFX i1   ić        eń        [śź]lić
SFX i1   ić        zenia     sić
SFX i1   ić        zenie     sić
SFX i1   ić        zeniem    sić
SFX i1   ić        zeniu     sić
SFX i1   ić        zeniami   sić
SFX i1   ić        zeniom    sić
SFX i1   ić        zeniach   sić
SFX i1   ić        zeń       sić
SFX i1   ić        zenia     zcić
SFX i1   ić        zenie     zcić
SFX i1   ić        zeniem    zcić
SFX i1   ić        zeniu     zcić
SFX i1   ić        zeniami   zcić
SFX i1   ić        zeniom    zcić
SFX i1   ić        zeniach   zcić
SFX i1   ić        zeń       zcić
SFX i1   ić        enia      [^ź][^aęo]zić
SFX i1   ić        enie      [^ź][^aęo]zić
SFX i1   ić        eniem     [^ź][^aęo]zić
SFX i1   ić        eniu      [^ź][^aęo]zić
SFX i1   ić        eniami    [^ź][^aęo]zić
SFX i1   ić        eniom     [^ź][^aęo]zić
SFX i1   ić        eniach    [^ź][^aęo]zić
SFX i1   ić        eń        [^ź][^aęo]zić
SFX i1   zić       żenia     [ao]zić
SFX i1   zić       żenie     [ao]zić
SFX i1   zić       żeniem    [ao]zić
SFX i1   zić       żeniu     [ao]zić
SFX i1   zić       żeniami   [ao]zić
SFX i1   zić       żeniom    [ao]zić
SFX i1   zić       żeniach   [ao]zić
SFX i1   zić       żeń       [ao]zić
SFX i1   ździć     żdżenia   ździć
SFX i1   ździć     żdżenie   ździć
SFX i1   ździć     żdżeniem  ździć
SFX i1   ździć     żdżeniu   ździć
SFX i1   ździć     żdżeniami ździć
SFX i1   ździć     żdżeniom  ździć
SFX i1   ździć     żdżeniach ździć
SFX i1   ździć     żdżeń     ździć
SFX i1   zić       żenia     [^ł]ęzić
SFX i1   zić       żenie     [^ł]ęzić
SFX i1   zić       żeniem    [^ł]ęzić
SFX i1   zić       żeniu     [^ł]ęzić
SFX i1   zić       żeniami   [^ł]ęzić
SFX i1   zić       żeniom    [^ł]ęzić
SFX i1   zić       żeniach   [^ł]ęzić
SFX i1   zić       żeń       [^ł]ęzić
SFX i1   ć         enia      łęzić
SFX i1   ć         enie      łęzić
SFX i1   ć         eniem     łęzić
SFX i1   ć         eniu      łęzić
SFX i1   ć         eniami    łęzić
SFX i1   ć         eniom     łęzić
SFX i1   ć         eniach    łęzić
SFX i1   ć         eń        łęzić
SFX i1   ść        dzenia    łaść
SFX i1   ść        dzenie    łaść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniem   łaść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniu    łaść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniami  łaść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniom   łaść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniach  łaść
SFX i1   ść        dzeń      łaść
SFX i1   ść        dnięcia   [pr]aść
SFX i1   ść        dnięcie   [pr]aść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciem  [pr]aść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciu   [pr]aść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciami [pr]aść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciom  [pr]aść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciach [pr]aść
SFX i1   ść        dnięć     [pr]aść
SFX i1   ść        dnięcia   iąść
SFX i1   ść        dnięcie   iąść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciem  iąść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciu   iąść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciami iąść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciom  iąść
SFX i1   ść        dnięciach iąść
SFX i1   ść        dnięć     iąść
SFX i1   ąść       ędzenia   ząść
SFX i1   ąść       ędzenie   ząść
SFX i1   ąść       ędzeniem  ząść
SFX i1   ąść       ędzeniu   ząść
SFX i1   ąść       ędzeniami ząść
SFX i1   ąść       ędzeniom  ząść
SFX i1   ąść       ędzeniach ząść
SFX i1   ąść       ędzeń     ząść
SFX i1   ąźć       ęźnięcia  ąźć
SFX i1   ąźć       ęźnięcie  ąźć
SFX i1   ąźć       ęźnięciem ąźć
SFX i1   ąźć       ęźnięciu  ąźć
SFX i1   ąźć       ęźnięciami ąźć
SFX i1   ąźć       ęźnięciom ąźć
SFX i1   ąźć       ęźnięciach ąźć
SFX i1   ąźć       ęźnięć    ąźć
SFX i1   ść        cenia     [mn]ieść
SFX i1   ść        cenie     [mn]ieść
SFX i1   ść        ceniem    [mn]ieść
SFX i1   ść        ceniu     [mn]ieść
SFX i1   ść        ceniami   [mn]ieść
SFX i1   ść        ceniom    [mn]ieść
SFX i1   ść        ceniach   [mn]ieść
SFX i1   ść        ceń       [mn]ieść
SFX i1   ść        dzenia    jeść
SFX i1   ść        dzenie    jeść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniem   jeść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniu    jeść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniami  jeść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniom   jeść
SFX i1   ść        dzeniach  jeść
SFX i1   ść        dzeń      jeść
SFX i1   ść        cenia     leść
SFX i1   ść        cenie     leść
SFX i1   ść        ceniem    leść
SFX i1   ść        ceniu     leść
SFX i1   ść        ceniami   leść
SFX i1   ść        ceniom    leść
SFX i1   ść        ceniach   leść
SFX i1   ść        ceń       leść
SFX i1   ść        ścia      jść
SFX i1   ść        ście      jść
SFX i1   ść        ściem     jść
SFX i1   ść        ściu      jść
SFX i1   ść        ściami    jść
SFX i1   ść        ściom     jść
SFX i1   ść        ściach    jść
SFX i1   ść        ść        jść
SFX i1   óść       ośnięcia  óść
SFX i1   óść       ośnięcie  óść
SFX i1   óść       ośnięciem óść
SFX i1   óść       ośnięciu  óść
SFX i1   óść       ośnięciami óść
SFX i1   óść       ośnięciom óść
SFX i1   óść       ośnięciach óść
SFX i1   óść       ośnięć    óść
